Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 1 Hunting and Fishing
70-4-117. Possession of weapons in areas inhabited by big game — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to be in possession of any firearm, bow and arrow, shotgun or rifle in, on, or while traversing any refuge, public hunting area or wildlife management area frequented or inhabited by big game, except during specified or lawful open seasons on these areas. Any person violating this section is guilty of hunting big game and shall be punished as provided for in subsections (b) and (c).

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

It is mandatory upon the court to impose the prison sentence, upon conviction for a second or subsequent offense, and the prison sentence is not subject to suspension.

In the prosecution of a second or subsequent offense, the indictment or presentment must allege the prior conviction for violating any of the provisions of this section, setting forth the time and place of each such prior conviction. The court shall prohibit such convicted person, either a first or subsequent offender, from hunting, fishing or trapping in this state for a period of one (1) year.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a person with a handgun carry permit pursuant to § 39-17-1351 may possess a handgun the entire year while on the premises of any refuge, public hunting area, wildlife management area or, to the extent permitted by federal law, national forest land maintained by the state. Nothing in this subsection (d) shall authorize a person to use any handgun to hunt unless the person is in full compliance with all wildlife laws, rules and regulations.

Nothing in this section shall authorize a person with a hand gun carry permit to possess such weapon in the portion of any refuge, public hunting area or wildlife management area that is within the boundaries of a state park or state natural area unless otherwise authorized in accordance with state law.

Nothing in this section shall authorize a person to access any area unless the person is in full compliance with all current wildlife laws, rules, proclamations and regulations.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, §§ 44, 47 (Williams, §§ 5178.73, 5178.76); Acts 1957, ch. 382, § 7; 1957, ch. 384, § 2; 1961, ch. 198, § 3; 1976, ch. 681, § 1; 1982, ch. 701, §§ 4-6; 1982, ch. 738, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-427, 51-429; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 981, § 3; 2009, ch. 606, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The penalty provided in this section was changed to a Class C misdemeanor by Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113. However, Acts 1990, ch. 981 provided that notwithstanding the provisions of ch. 591, § 113, a violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-118. Unlawful to hunt deer being chased by dogs or to permit dogs to hunt or chase deer — Confiscation of dogs — Penalties.

No person shall knowingly hunt deer being chased by dogs nor shall any person knowingly and intentionally permit such person's dogs to hunt or chase deer.

Any officer of the wildlife resources agency may take into possession any dog known to have hunted or chased deer and shall notify the owner of the dog, or if the owner is unknown, shall advertise in a newspaper of general circulation in the county that the dog is in the officer's possession, giving the description of the dog and stating the circumstances under which it was taken. The officer shall hold the dog for a period of ten (10) days and shall report the facts in full to the director.

If, within ten (10) days, the owner claims the dog, the owner may repossess it on payment of the costs of advertising and the cost of keep. If the owner does not claim the dog within the above specified time, the dog shall be deemed ownerless and a public nuisance and shall be disposed of in the manner prescribed by the executive director. In this event, the costs of advertising and keep shall be paid by the agency.

Any person violating this section commits a Class B misdemeanor. It is mandatory upon the court to impose the prison sentence, and the minimum time is not subject to suspension, but may be served on such days designated by the judge.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the commission is authorized to promulgate rules to allow for the use of dogs in tracking and recovering an injured or deceased deer.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 46 (Williams, § 5178.75); Acts 1961, ch. 198, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1981, ch. 199, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-428; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 891, § 15; 1990, ch. 981, § 3; 2018, ch. 641, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The penalty provided in this section was changed to a Class C misdemeanor by Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113. However, Acts 1990, ch. 981 provided that notwithstanding the provisions of ch. 591, § 113, a violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Cross-References. General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-119. Taking of aquatic animal life other than game fish — Possession of commercial fishing gear on contaminated waters — Use of explosives, electrical devices or poisons in taking fish — Penalties.

The taking of fish, mussels, turtles and other aquatic animal life, other than those species designated as game fish, from the waters of this state is not permitted except in accordance with the following provisions:

Any and all varieties of fish, mussels, turtles and other aquatic animal life may be sold commercially, subject to limitations prescribed by the fish and wildlife commission;

The commission is hereby authorized to designate all waters that shall be opened to the use of various types of gear to be used for the commercial taking of fish, mussels, turtles and other aquatic animal life, and the commission is authorized to specify the types of commercial gear to be used for the taking of fish, mussels, turtles and other aquatic animal life from any of such waters, under regulations prescribed by the commission in its proclamation for the commercial taking of fish, mussels, turtles and other aquatic animal life;

The possession or use, or both, of any type of gear that is not specifically authorized by the commission, or that is not properly licensed, is forbidden. No commercial gear may be possessed on, or immediately adjacent to, any body of water where such gear is not authorized;

Any wildlife accidentally taken in connection with a commercial operation under this section shall be quickly and carefully released with the least possible injury;

Each piece of commercial fishing gear, including trotlines, fished commercially, shall bear securely fastened to the gear at the head end of the line or net or to the float, a current and valid identifying tag to be supplied by the commercial fisher. The tag shall measure at least one inch by three inches (1" x 3") and shall have the name of the commercial fisher along with the commercial fisher's current license number.

The commission is hereby authorized to promulgate proclamations pertaining to the use of slat baskets by sport fishing license holders. Such baskets shall be marked with an identifying tag, which will expire the last day of February following the date of issue. This tag will be issued to each sport fishing license holder upon application to the agency and upon payment of not more than five dollars ($5.00) to defray the cost and expense of furnishing each tag;

It is unlawful for a commercial fisher to possess, while engaging in commercial fishing, any species of fish that cannot legally be taken with commercial fishing gear, except for legally taken bream less than four inches (4") in length, which may be used as bait;

Any person violating this section or any proclamation promulgated pursuant to this section commits a Class B misdemeanor and also is prohibited from engaging in sport fishing, commercial fishing or commercial musseling for a period of time of not less than one (1) year. Any person who engages in sport fishing, commercial fishing or commercial musseling during the prohibited time set by the court commits a Class B misdemeanor;

For enforcement purposes, if fewer than five percent (5%) by number of mussels taken by a commercial musseler are not suitable for sale because such mussels are too small, no sanctions shall be imposed against such commercial musseler; and

Wholesale fish dealers and wholesale mussel dealers shall supply, upon request from the director of wildlife resources agency or the director's agent, reports detailing the quantities of fish and mussels purchased. Records shall be made available for inspection upon request by agents during normal business hours.

Possession of commercial fishing gear on, or immediately adjacent to, any waters closed due to contamination, or possession of any species of fish, turtle or other aquatic animal life taken from waters closed to that species due to contamination is punishable as a Class A misdemeanor. Additionally, such person shall be prohibited from engaging in commercial fishing for not less than six (6) years.

It is unlawful to use or possess dynamite, an electrical device, explosives, chemicals, lime or poison to kill or stun fish, or to attempt to do so.

A violation of subdivision (c)(1) is a Class B misdemeanor.

Each fish killed and each stick of dynamite or dynamite cap used is a separate offense.

The executive director, or the executive director's designated agents, may use any substance, chemical, or device to stun or kill fish for scientific, propagating, enforcement or rescue purposes, and may use poison in certain waters or lakes of the state where it is necessary to remove or eradicate undesirable species of fish from the waters.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, §§ 23, 29; 1953, ch. 226, §§ 1, 2 (Williams, §§ 5178.52, 5178.58); Acts 1957, ch. 386, § 4; 1959, ch. 126, § 2; 1961, ch. 256, § 1; 1971, ch. 414, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1978, ch. 738, § 22; 1980, ch. 633, § 1; 1982, ch. 807, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-437, 51-438; Acts 1987, ch. 156, § 1; 1989, ch. 486, § 16; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 610, § 1; 1990, ch. 891, §§ 16-18; 1990, ch. 981, § 3; 1994, ch. 727, § 6; 1999, ch. 91, § 2; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. The penalty provided in this section was changed to a Class C misdemeanor on November 1, 1989 by Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113. However, Acts 1990, ch. 981, § 3 provided that notwithstanding the provisions of ch. 591, § 113, a violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Cross-References. General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Penalties for Class A, B misdemeanors, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Fish and Fisheries, § 1; 20 Tenn. Juris., Poisons, § 1.

70-4-120. Trapping, snaring or baiting regulations — Penalties for violations — Snare traps — Use of tamed quail to train bird dogs.

It is unlawful for any person, except as provided in this chapter, to set or place any trap or snare, or bait any trap or device, upon the lands of, or in the waters adjoining the lands of, any person, for the purpose of catching or killing any wild animal upon the lands of another, except during the open season on such animals, and then only after such person has obtained the written consent of the owner of the lands, which written consent shall be upon the person who may be using or setting the devices; provided, that nets, spring poles and deadfalls are prohibited at all times and all places.

The commission shall promulgate rules or adopt proclamations, as necessary, to:

Determine the types of steel traps that may be used in the taking of wild animals; and

Regulate the placement of steel traps.

The commission shall promulgate rules or adopt proclamations, as necessary, to establish inspection requirements for steel traps used in the taking of wild animals.

Persons trapping upon the lands of another shall at once make to the owner of the lands a full written report of the head of fowl, stock, or dog caught in the steel trap or other trapping device set by such person, giving the date the fowl, stock or dog was caught, with a full description of the fowl, stock or dog.

When damage is done to any person's fowl, stock, dogs or the like by reason of being caught by the device, the one setting or placing the device shall be liable for all damages done by such device.

All traps set or used for the purpose of taking any wild animals shall be stamped with the owner's name in such manner that the same shall be legible at all times. Any trap or traps found that are not stamped may be confiscated or destroyed.

Any person violating this section commits a Class C misdemeanor and also is prohibited from trapping or engaging in the business of buying or selling furs for a period of time of not less than one (1) year, or both. Any person who traps or engages in the business of buying or selling furs during the period commits a Class C misdemeanor.

It is lawful at all times for any person to train bird dogs through the use of release pens and tamed and identified quail. The tamed quail shall be identified through the use of tags or dye and the training of the bird dogs shall be conducted under such rules and regulations as may be promulgated by the fish and wildlife commission.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 48 (Williams, § 5178.77); Acts 1971, ch. 381, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1980, ch. 655, § 1; 1981, ch. 197, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-439; Acts 1985, ch. 148, § 2; 1985, ch. 253, § 1; 1988, ch. 772, § 1; 1988, ch. 915, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1997, ch. 158, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 46, § 1; 2008, ch. 675, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 13; 2017, ch. 203, §§ 2-4.

Cross-References. General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-121. United States fish and wildlife service exempt from game laws.

It is lawful for the director of the United States fish and wildlife service and the director's duly authorized agents to take at any time and in any manner from the public fresh waters of this state all fish required by them for the operation of the state and federal hatcheries. The United States fish and wildlife service is exempt, in the operation of federal fish hatcheries in Tennessee, from the state game laws. The director of the United States fish and wildlife service and the director's duly authorized agents are accorded the right to conduct fish hatching and fish culture and all operations connected with fish hatching and fish culture in any manner and at any time that may by the director be considered necessary and proper, any laws of the state to the contrary notwithstanding.

Acts 1931, ch. 53, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.107 (Williams, § 5175.55); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-440.

70-4-122. Coon dog training.

It is unlawful for any person or firm to train coon dogs by chasing coons in West Tennessee and the following counties: Carter, Claiborne, Greene, Johnson, Sullivan, and that part of DeKalb County lying south and west of state highway No. 96 and U.S. Highway No. 70, except during the thirty (30) days immediately preceding the opening of the season under general laws of the state for hunting coons; provided, that none of the provisions of this subsection (a) shall apply to Shelby County or the counties of McNairy, Fayette, Hardeman, Decatur, Dyer, Carroll, Henry, Weakley and Chester.

As used in this subsection (a), “West Tennessee” includes that portion of the state lying west of the Tennessee River where it enters the state from the states of Alabama and Mississippi and emerges into the state of Kentucky, but “West Tennessee” does not include Benton County, Gibson County, Madison County, Henderson County or Hardin County. This subsection (a) also applies to the following counties located in other parts of the state: Carter, Claiborne, Greene, Johnson, Morgan, Sullivan, Unicoi, and that part of DeKalb County lying south and west of state highway No. 96 and U.S. Highway No. 70.

Cocke County. It is lawful in Cocke County to have a jump-out training season during the period each year from October 9 through November 1, and notwithstanding other provisions of this section, it is lawful to train coon dogs in Cocke County at any time of the year, except during the period each year from March 1 to May 15, so long as coons are not taken except during the open season.

Crockett County. It is lawful at any time of the year to train coon dogs in Crockett County so long as coons are not taken except during the open season.

Gibson County. It is lawful at any time of the year to train coon dogs in Gibson County, so long as coons are not taken except during the open season.

Grainger County. It is unlawful for any person or firm to train coon dogs by chasing coons in Grainger County, except during the period beginning October 1 through February 28, so long as coons are not taken except during the open season.

Hancock County. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, it is lawful to train coon dogs in Hancock County at any time of the year, except during the period each year from March 1 to May 15, so long as coons are not taken except during the open season.

Hawkins County. It is unlawful for any person or firm to train coon dogs by chasing coons in Hawkins County except during the open season.

Haywood County. It is lawful at any time of the year to train coon dogs in Haywood County, so long as coons are not taken except during the open season.

Humphreys County. It is lawful at any time of the year to train coon dogs in Humphreys County, so long as coons are not taken except during the open season.

Jefferson County. It is lawful in Jefferson County to have a jump-out training season during the period each year from October 9 through November 1, and notwithstanding other provisions of this section, it is lawful to train coon dogs in Jefferson County at any time of the year, except during the period each year from March 1 to May 15, so long as coons are not taken except during the open season.

Lake County.

It is unlawful for any person or firm to train coon dogs by chasing coons in Lake County except during the open season.

This subdivision (b)(10) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body of Lake County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the Lake County legislative body and certified by such officer to the secretary of state.

Lauderdale County. It is lawful at any time of the year to train coon dogs in Lauderdale County, so long as coons are not taken except during the open season.

Morgan County. It is lawful to conduct sanctioned coon hunts in Morgan County during the closed season, so long as coons are not taken during such closed season. For the purposes of this subdivision (b)(12), “sanctioned coon hunts” means chasing coons for the purpose of treeing only. The sanctioned hunts shall require the approval of a recognized kennel club such as the AKC, UKC, NKC or PKC.

Obion County. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, it is lawful to train coon dogs in Obion County at any time of the year, so long as coons are not taken except during the open season.

Tipton County. It is lawful at any time of the year to train coon dogs in Tipton County, so long as coons are not taken except during the open season.

Unicoi County. It is unlawful for any person or firm to train coon dogs by chasing coons in Unicoi County except during the seventy (70) days immediately prior to the season for hunting coons in such county.

Washington County. It is unlawful for any person or firm to train coon dogs by chasing coons in Washington County except during the open season.

A person who violates this section commits a Class C misdemeanor. Nothing in this section shall be construed as restricting the training of coon dogs where no element of chasing or hunting coons is involved.

Acts 1955, ch. 134, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 387, § 1; 1959, ch. 96, § 1; 1959, ch. 179, § 1; 1959, ch. 183, § 1; 1959, ch. 288, § 1; 1961, ch. 249, § 1; 1961, ch. 261, § 1; 1963, ch. 122, § 1; 1963, ch. 131, § 1; 1963, ch. 138, § 1; 1963, ch. 182, § 1; 1963, ch. 210, § 1; 1963, ch. 350, § 1; 1963, ch. 375, § 1; 1965, ch. 21, § 1; 1965, ch. 51, § 1; 1965, ch. 315, § 1; 1965, ch. 318, § 1; 1967, ch. 39, § 1; 1967, ch. 74, § 1; 1967, ch. 75, § 1; 1967, ch. 76, § 1; 1967, ch. 128, § 1; 1967, ch. 299, § 1; 1967, ch. 351, § 1; Private Acts of 1967, ch. 25, § 1; Acts 1968, ch. 612, § 1; 1969, ch. 125, § 1; 1969, ch. 253, § 1; 1969, ch. 263, § 1; 1970, ch. 436, § 1; 1971, ch. 15, § 1; 1971, ch. 18, § 1; 1971, ch. 94, § 1; 1971, ch. 129, § 1; 1972, ch. 579, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 51, § 1; 1973, ch. 58, § 1; 1973, ch. 306, § 1; 1973, ch. 351, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 18; 1974, ch. 636, § 1; 1975, ch. 240, § 1; 1976, ch. 663, § 1; 1976, ch. 714, § 1; 1977, ch. 167, § 1; 1977, ch. 494, § 1; 1978, ch. 665, §§ 1-3; 1978, ch. 916, § 1; Private Acts of 1978, ch. 265, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1979, ch. 30, § 1; 1979, ch. 48, § 1; 1979, ch. 75, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 139, § 1; 1979, ch. 375, § 1; 1981, ch. 4, § 1; 1982, ch. 676, § 1; 1982, ch. 758, §§ 1-4; 1982, ch. 923, §§ 1-3; T.C.A., § 51-441; Acts 1983, ch. 309, § 1; 1985, ch. 422, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 502, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 781, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 839, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 372, § 1; 1995, ch. 262, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 611, § 1; 2012, ch. 644, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions concerning Tipton County are derived from Private Acts of 1967, ch. 25, § 1; Acts 1965, ch. 318, § 1 had provided that training coon dogs by chasing raccoons was lawful from September 1 through February 15.

This section provides that it shall be unlawful to train coon dogs by chasing coons in Hawkins County, except during the open season. However, ch. 320 of the Private Acts of 1982 provides that it “shall be unlawful for any person or firm to train coon dogs in Hawkins County during the period beginning March 1 and ending August 31 in each year,” subject to local approval. These provisions may be in conflict, depending on when the open season is set by the wildlife resources commission (now the fish and wildlife commission).

Cross-References. Coon dog training in eastern counties, § 70-4-112.

General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-123. Hunting with bow and arrow while in possession of firearms or accompanied by a person in possession of firearms — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person hunting big game with a bow and arrow to be in possession of any firearms or be accompanied in hunting by any person possessing firearms during the archery-only deer season; provided, that persons authorized to carry a handgun pursuant to § 39-17-1351 may carry a handgun as defined in § 39-11-106(a) while hunting big game with a bow and arrow during the archery-only deer season.

A person who violates this section commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1967, ch. 40, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 738, § 23; T.C.A., § 51-443; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2010, ch. 621, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-124. Wearing daylight fluorescent orange color while hunting big game required — Penalty.

Every person hunting big game except turkey during the gun hunts proclaimed by the commission shall wear on the upper portion of the body and head outer garments of daylight fluorescent orange color of not less than five hundred square inches (500 sq. in.) and visible from the front and back.

“Daylight fluorescent orange color” means having a dominant wave length between five hundred ninety-five thousandths (0.595) and six hundred five thousandths (0.605) nanometers, excitation purity of not less than eighty-five percent (85%) and a luminance factor of not less than forty percent (40%).

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

This section does not apply to a person hunting on that person's own property.

Notwithstanding § 8-21-401, the court costs imposed or assessed against any person convicted of a violation of this section may not exceed the maximum fine amount that may be imposed for a violation of this section.

Acts 1975, ch. 178, §§ 1-3; 1982, ch. 738, § 24; T.C.A., § 51-445; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2017, ch. 403, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 403, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section by adding (e), shall apply to all violations that occur on or after July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-125. Causing death to wildlife, hunting dog or domestic animal by poisonous substance prohibited.

No person shall deposit, place or cause to be deposited or placed out of doors any poisonous substance or any matter that has been rendered poisonous that causes or is capable of causing death or injury to wildlife, a hunting dog, or a domestic animal. Such prohibition applies only where the substance or matter is placed on the property of another.

No person shall knowingly or recklessly place or deposit, or cause to be placed or deposited, on such person's property a poisonous substance or any matter that would be rendered poisonous if consumed by an animal or human being, if such poison or poisonous matter could be reasonably assumed to be accessible by a minor under the age of fifteen (15) years. This subsection (b) shall only apply if the placing or depositing of the poisonous substance is done with the intent of causing death or injury to a hunting dog or a domestic animal.

A person who violates this section commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Such prohibition does not apply to rabies control activities of the appropriate public health officials.

Acts 1978, ch. 792, § 1; T.C.A., § 51-446; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1995, ch. 211, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-126. Use of electronic or battery operated device to lure or kill a fox prohibited — Penalty.

No person shall use any electronic or battery operated device for the purpose of luring, killing, or attempting to lure or kill a fox.

A person who violates this section commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Such prohibition does not apply to rabies control activities of the appropriate public health officials.

Acts 1978, ch. 792, § 1; 1982, ch. 738, § 5; T.C.A., § 51-447; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-127. Dove-baiting prohibited.

It is a criminal offense to bait a field or other area. “Bait,” as used in this section, means the intentional placement of grain or any mixture of any ingredients used as or for food purposes for the purpose of killing, injuring, or capturing doves. “Bait” does not include the broadcasting or sowing of grain or seed for normal agricultural purposes, the placement of salt pans or troughs for livestock, the practice of leaving or manipulating standing crops in a field, or other normal agricultural practices customarily practiced on the land.

Any person who enters upon the lands of another to bait a field or other area commits criminal trespass, and, upon conviction, shall be punished in accordance with § 39-14-405.

Any person who baits a field or other area or any person who assists, employs or directs another to do so commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1983, ch. 471, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1996, ch. 675, § 73.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

70-4-128. Posting notice of dove-baiting.

If any Tennessee wildlife resources agency officer or employee has reasonable cause to believe that a field has been unlawfully baited with grain or any mixture of any ingredients used as or for food purposes for the purpose of killing, injuring or capturing doves, then such officer or employee shall immediately post notices on such field in conspicuous locations that the field is baited and hunting is prohibited. If any such officer or employee discovers and fails to post such field in accordance with this section, no person shall be subject to prosecution for hunting on or over such field, notwithstanding any provision of this title to the contrary. The Tennessee wildlife resources agency and its officers and employees are exempt from civil liability in its actions in enforcement of this section.

Acts 1983, ch. 167, § 1; 1984, ch. 535, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

70-4-129. Sale of fish and wildlife by charitable organizations.

Notwithstanding § 70-4-101, or rules, regulations or proclamations of the agency or commission to the contrary, fish and wildlife may be sold by charitable organizations in any county having a population of not less than twenty-seven thousand eight hundred (27,800) nor more than twenty-eight thousand (28,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census for fundraising purposes in accordance with subsection (b).

Notwithstanding any provision of this title or rule, regulation or proclamation of the agency or commission to the contrary, fish and wildlife that are lawfully taken or acquired and donated to an organization that has received a determination of exemption from the internal revenue service pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501 (c)(3) may be sold by such organization to raise funds if the following conditions are met:

The organization distributes at least ninety percent (90%) of the funds raised to other organizations that have received a determination of exemption from the internal revenue service pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501;

The organization maintains records for three (3) years of the source of such donations, and such records are made available for inspection upon request of the wildlife resources agency; and

The organization notifies the wildlife resources agency thirty (30) days in advance of any such sale.

Acts 1993, ch. 83, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

70-4-130. Albino deer.

Except as provided in § 70-4-115, it is unlawful for any person to knowingly hunt, kill, trap, ensnare, or destroy, or to attempt to destroy, or to have in such person's possession albino deer, which is a deer with a lack or significant deficiency of pigment in the skin and hair and with pink eyes.

Any violations of the proclamations or rules and regulations promulgated by the fish and wildlife commission are punishable as provided in this title, and the illegal taking or possession of each animal constitutes a separate offense.

Violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor, punishable by fine only.

Acts 2001, ch. 24, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-131. Possession of fish or wildlife illegally acquired, taken or transported from state or country of origin.

It is an offense for any person to possess any fish or wildlife that has been defined as fish or wildlife by the state or country of origin knowing that the fish or wildlife was acquired, taken, or transported from the state or country of origin in violation of the laws or regulations of that state or country.

A violation of subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 2007, ch. 82, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-132. Walleye and crappie in restaurants.

Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a restaurant located in this state may advertise, possess, sell, offer for sale or give away fully cooked crappie or walleye for consumption on the premises of the restaurant; provided, that the crappie or walleye is not harvested from the waters of this state and that appropriate documentation is maintained on the premises of the restaurant exhibiting the location of origin of the crappie and walleye.

Acts 2009, ch. 596, § 2.

70-4-133. Wild-appearing swine.

It is the intent of this section to address the illegal translocation and release of wild-appearing swine. These animals have been shown to be destructive to native habitats, agricultural lands and private property and are carriers for a myriad of diseases that affect humans, livestock and wildlife.

It is not the intent of this section to impede the legal transportation of swine that are regulated by the department of agriculture.

As used in this section, “wild-appearing swine” means swine that are, at maturity, two feet to three feet (2' – 3') tall and three and one half feet to five feet (3 ½' – 5') long and, at maturity, have the following physical features in comparison to domestic swine:

Massive heads with smaller, pointed and heavily-furred ears;

Heavier shoulders that slope down to small hips, giving the animal an outline similar to an American bison;

Long and thin snouts;

Upper tusks or whitters that curl up and out and rub against the lower tusks, making a knifelike edge against the lower tusks; and

Straight tails that are tufted at the tip.

It is an offense for any person to knowingly transport or release into the wild, or cause to be transported into or within the state, live wild-appearing swine that do not have documentation approved by the department of agriculture.

Notwithstanding § 70-6-101, any stop, search or arrest pursuant to this section by an officer of the agency shall be predicated upon reasonable suspicion that a violation of this section has occurred.

A violation of subsection (d) is a Class A misdemeanor. Each undocumented wild-appearing swine illegally transported or released in violation of subsection (d) is a separate offense.

Acts 2012, ch. 866, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-134. Availability of self-defense to person charged with taking, attempting to take, or harming wild animal.

As used in this section:

“Enter” means the intrusion of any part of the body of a wild animal into the interior space of a structure;

“Serious bodily injury” means bodily injury that involves:

A substantial risk of death;

Protracted unconsciousness;

Extreme physical pain;

Protracted or obvious disfigurement; or

Protracted loss or substantial impairment of a function of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty; and

“Wild animal” means all wild vertebrates, mollusks, crustaceans, and fish presently occurring within the state.

A person who is charged with taking, attempting to take, or harming a wild animal in violation of this title may assert the defense of self-defense if the wild animal taken, attempted to be taken, or harmed acted in a manner that caused:

The person to have a reasonable belief that the animal's action placed the person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury;

The person to believe the danger creating the threat of imminent death or serious bodily injury is real, or is honestly believed to be real at the time; and

The belief of danger to be founded upon reasonable grounds.

A person shall notify the agency within twenty-four (24) hours after killing or seriously injuring a big game animal pursuant to this section if the person is reasonably able to notify the agency.

No big game animal killed shall be removed from the site, repositioned, retained, sold, or transferred without authorization from the agency.

A violation of subdivision (c)(1) is a Class C misdemeanor.

The defense of self-defense shall not be available to a person who takes, attempts to take, or harms a wild animal if the person:

Has the ability to safely retreat from the threatening animal and fails to do so, except when the animal enters a home, tent, camper, or other permanent or temporary living structure occupied at the time by the person or any other individual; or

Recklessly provokes or attracts the wild animal into a situation in which it is reasonable to expect the wild animal will threaten the person or another individual.

Acts 2015, ch. 173, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.